Illinois, session 104th, SB2947.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Section 143.17 and by adding Article XLVIII as 6follows: 7    (215 ILCS 5/143.17)  (from Ch. 73, par. 755.17)8    Sec. 143.17. Notice of intention not to renew. 9    a. No company shall fail to renew any policy of insurance, 10as defined in subsections (a), (b), (c), and (h) of Section 11143.13, to which Section 143.11 applies, unless it shall send 12by mail to the named insured at least 30 days advance notice of 13its intention not to renew. The company shall maintain proof 14of mailing of such notice on a recognized U.S. Post Office form 15or a form acceptable to the U. S. Post Office or other 16commercial mail delivery service. The nonrenewal shall not 17become effective until at least 30 days from the proof of 18mailing date of the notice to the name insured. Notification 19shall also be sent to the insured's broker, if known, or the 20agent of record, if known, and to the last known mortgagee or 21lien holder. For purposes of this Section, the mortgagee or 22lien holder, insured's broker, or the agent of record may opt 23to accept notification electronically. However, where   SB2947- 2 -LRB104 19637 BAB 33086 b1cancellation is for nonpayment of premium, the notice of 2cancellation must be mailed at least 10 days before the 3effective date of the cancellation.4    b. This Section does not apply if the company has 5manifested its willingness to renew directly to the named 6insured. Such written notice shall specify the premium amount 7payable, including any premium payment plan available, and the 8name of any person or persons, if any, authorized to receive 9payment on behalf of the company. If no person is so 10authorized, the premium notice shall so state.11    b-5. This Section does not apply if the company manifested 12its willingness to renew directly to the named insured. 13However, no company may impose renewal premium increases of 14more than 10% for lines of business enumerated in subsection 15(b) of Section 143.13 to which Section 143.11 applies unless 16the company mails or delivers by electronic means, in 17compliance with Section 143.34, to the named insured notice of 18the increase in renewal premium at least 60 days before the 19renewal or anniversary date. No no company may impose changes 20in deductibles or coverage for any policy forms applicable to 21an entire line of business enumerated in subsections (a), (b), 22(c), and (h) of Section 143.13 to which Section 143.11 applies 23unless the company mails or delivers by electronic means, in 24compliance with Section 143.34, to the named insured written 25notice of the change in deductible or coverage at least 60 days 26prior to the renewal or anniversary date. For purposes of this   SB2947- 3 -LRB104 19637 BAB 33086 b1subsection, "lines of business enumerated in subsection (b) of 2Section 143.13 to which Section 143.11 applies" does not 3include lines of business excluded under paragraph (1), (2), 4(3), or (4) of Section 1802. 5    Notice shall also be sent to the insured's broker, if 6known, or the agent of record. For purposes of this subsection 7b-5, policyholder-initiated changes to coverage and exposure 8changes are not included in the renewal premium increases that 9require a company to provide notice to the insured. 10    c. Should a company fail to comply with (a) or (b) of this 11Section, the policy shall terminate only on the effective date 12of any similar insurance procured by the insured with respect 13to the same subject or location designated in both policies.14    d. Renewal of a policy does not constitute a waiver or 15estoppel with respect to grounds for cancellation which 16existed before the effective date of such renewal.17    e. In all notices of intention not to renew any policy of 18insurance, as defined in Section 143.11 the company shall 19provide the named insured a specific explanation of the 20reasons for nonrenewal.21    f. For purposes of this Section, the insured's broker, if 22known, or the agent of record and the mortgagee or lien holder 23may opt to accept notification electronically. 24(Source: P.A. 100-475, eff. 1-1-18.) 25    (215 ILCS 5/Art. XLVIII heading new)  SB2947- 4 -LRB104 19637 BAB 33086 b1ARTICLE XLVIII. RATES FOR FIRE AND EXTENDED COVERAGE INSURANCE 2    (215 ILCS 5/1801 new)3    Sec. 1801. Purpose. The purpose of this Article is to 4promote the public welfare by regulating fire and extended 5coverage insurance rates so that the rates will not be 6excessive, inadequate, or unfairly discriminatory. Nothing in 7this Article is intended to prohibit or discourage reasonable 8competition or to authorize or encourage, except to the extent 9necessary to accomplish the purpose of this Article, 10uniformity in insurance rates, rating systems, rating plans, 11or practices. This Article shall be liberally construed to 12carry into effect the provisions of this Section. 13    (215 ILCS 5/1802 new)14    Sec. 1802. Applicability. This Article applies to policies 15of fire and extended coverage insurance, as defined in 16subsection (b) of Section 143.13 of this Code, to which 17Section 143.11 of this Code applies. This Article does not 18apply to the following:19        (1) policies for any commercial liability and property 20    insurance;21        (2) policies for a structure, all or part of which is 22    leased or rented, regardless of whether the insured 23    occupied all or part of the structure as a primary 24    residence;  SB2947- 5 -LRB104 19637 BAB 33086 b1        (3) policies for a structure that is unoccupied and 2    intended by the insured to be sold, leased, or rented or 3    policies for a structure that is unoccupied and under 4    active construction, renovation, or substantial 5    improvement and that is intended by the insured to be 6    sold, leased, or rented; and7        (4) policies for a home or dwelling that is part of a 8    farm policy, regardless of whether the insured owned the 9    dwelling or occupied the dwelling as a primary residence. 10    (215 ILCS 5/1803 new)11    Sec. 1803. Rate standards; excessive, inadequate, or 12unfairly discriminatory. 13    (a) Rates shall not be excessive, inadequate, or unfairly 14discriminatory.15    (b) A rate is inadequate if it endangers the solvency of 16the insurer.17    (c) A rate is unfairly discriminatory if, after allowing 18for practical limitations, the price differentials fail to 19reflect the difference in expected losses and expenses. A rate 20is not unfairly discriminatory if different rates result for 21policyholders with similar loss exposures but different 22expenses, or similar expenses but different loss exposures, so 23long as the rate reflects the differences with reasonable 24accuracy.25    (d) A rate is reasonable and not excessive, inadequate, or   SB2947- 6 -LRB104 19637 BAB 33086 b1unfairly discriminatory if it is an actuarially sound estimate 2of the expected value of all future costs associated with an 3individual risk transfer. 4    (215 ILCS 5/1804 new)5    Sec. 1804. Determinations and notice; hearing. 6    (a) If the Department proves through independent actuarial 7testing consistent with actuarial professional standards that 8a filing is excessive, inadequate, or unfairly discriminatory 9pursuant to subsection (d) of this Section and Section 1803, 10the Department shall send the company notice within 60 days 11after the filing specifying: (1) in what respects the filing 12fails to meet the requirements of this Article, and (2) if 13applicable, any modifications that are required. The notice 14shall specify a reasonable period after which the filing is no 15longer effective if the company fails to timely request a 16hearing under subsection (b). If the company timely requests a 17hearing under subsection (b), the filing shall remain in 18effect until the conclusion of the hearing and a final order is 19issued. If the Department finds that a rate is excessive, 20inadequate, or unfairly discriminatory pursuant to this 21Article, the final order may specify a reasonable period after 22which the filing is no longer effective.23    (b) The company may request a hearing on the notice within 2430 days after receipt. Failure to request a hearing within 25that 30-day period shall be deemed the company's acceptance of   SB2947- 7 -LRB104 19637 BAB 33086 b1the Department's determination. Failure by the Department to 2hold the requested hearing within 60 days after the request 3and to resolve the outcome of the hearing within 90 days after 4the initial request shall result in dismissal of the 5Department's objection and the filing will remain in effect.6    (c) All material, testing, and communication regarding 7activities outlined in subsections (a) and (b) of this Section 8shall be regarded as confidential work papers.9    (d) Subsections (a), (b), and (c) shall apply only to 10filings submitted on or after January 1, 2027. Failure of the 11Department to make timely objections as outlined in subsection 12(a) shall result in the filing being deemed compliant with 13this Article.14    (e) Any party aggrieved by a final order under this 15Article may seek judicial review in the Circuit Court of 16Sangamon County under the Administrative Review Law.  17    (215 ILCS 5/1805 new)18    Sec. 1805. Prohibition on cost-shifting. Credible 19State-specific loss experience shall be used in the 20development of rates whenever such data is available and 21statistically reliable. To meet actuarial standards of 22credibility, insurers may supplement State-specific loss 23experience with countrywide, regional, or out-of-state loss 24experience. Nothing in this Section shall apply to rating 25relativity development during ratemaking. This Section shall   SB2947- 8 -LRB104 19637 BAB 33086 b1only apply to companies issuing policies that are subject to 2this Article.  3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 41, 2027.